Alabama, session 2026rs, HB556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a)(1) The Montgomery County Commission
shall create the Montgomery County Legislative Delegation
Fund. The monies in the fund may be expended by the members of
the delegation to support the operation of the Montgomery
County Legislative Delegation Office.
(2) Upon receipt of any monies distributed to
Montgomery County pursuant to Section 40-25-82, Code of
Alabama 1975, the county commission shall deposit the monies
into the fund.
(b) The largest municipality in Montgomery County shall
provide adequate space for the office, including telephone
service, Internet service, electricity, water, and any other
necessary utility services.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB556 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 17-Mar-26, as amended.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed



Page 2